src/ara-lex.txt
Multichar_Symbols

! For nouns
@U.ART.PRESENT@ @U.ART.ABSENT@ uN aN iN
@U.CASE.NOM@ @U.CASE.ACC@ @U.CASE.GEN@
+N +Def +Indef +Pr+ +Art+ +Nom +Acc +Gen
! For verbs
^[ ^] +3P +Masc +Fem
+Sg +Act +Pass +FormI +FormIII


LEXICON Root
Nouns ;
Verbs ;

! Nouns
! =====



LEXICON Nouns
        Preposition ;

LEXICON Preposition
bi+Pr+:bi       Prepmark ;
               Article ;

LEXICON Prepmark
@U.CASE.GEN@ Article ;

LEXICON Article
al+Art+:al Articlemark ;
          Stems ;

LEXICON Articlemark
@U.ART.PRESENT@ Stems ;

LEXICON Stems
kitaab Tag ;

LEXICON Tag
+N: Case ;

LEXICON Case
+Def+Nom:u     MarkNOM ;
+Def+Acc:a     MarkACC ;
+Def+Gen:i     MarkGEN ;
@U.ART.ABSENT@ IndefCase ;

LEXICON IndefCase
+Indef+Nom:uN MarkNOM ;
+Indef+Acc:aN MarkACC ;
+Indef+Gen:iN MarkGEN ;

LEXICON MarkNOM
@U.CASE.NOM@ # ;

LEXICON MarkACC
@U.CASE.ACC@ # ;

LEXICON MarkGEN
@U.CASE.GEN@ # ;




! Verbs
! =====

LEXICON Verbs
LBound ;

LEXICON LBound
[:^[{ Roots ;

LEXICON Roots
ktb MergeRight ;
drs MergeRight ;
bsl MergeRight ;

LEXICON MergeRight
0:}.m%>.{ Template ; ! % literalizes the >

LEXICON Template
+FormI:CVCVC MergeLeft ;
+FormIII:CVVCVC MergeLeft ;

LEXICON MergeLeft
0:}.%<m. Vocalization ; ! % literalizes the <

LEXICON Vocalization
+Act:[a+] RBound ;
+Pass:[u*i] RBound ;

LEXICON RBound
]:^] PerfEnd ;

LEXICON PerfEnd
+3P+Masc+Sg:a # ;
+3P+Fem+Sg:at # ;
